dev/apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
<pardef n="W/A__v">
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r>A<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/jA__v">

<e><p><l>jA</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h0"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jA</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h0"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAo</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAo</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAo</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAo</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAiye</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAiye</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAiye</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAiye</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>




<e><p><l>gayA</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayA</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayA</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayA</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaye</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaye</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaye</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaye</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayI</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayI</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayI</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayI</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaI</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaI</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaI</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaI</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayIM</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayIM</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayIM</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayIM</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaIM</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaIM</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaIM</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaIM</l><r>jA<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="rAw/a__n">					
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eM</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="BIda/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="ASA/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yeM</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="gudiy/A__n">					
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Az</l><r>A<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>A<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="IrRyA/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="Apawwi/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yoM</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="SAnwi/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					

<e lm="aMgarakRA"><i>aMgarakRA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="anavasWiwi"><i>anavasWiwi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="aruci"><i>aruci</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="asaMBAvanA"><i>asaMBAvanA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="asamiyA"><i>asamiyA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="asi"><i>asi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="avinaya"><i>avinaya</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="ayukwi"><i>ayukwi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="azXeriyA"><i>azXeriyA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="baCiyA"><i>baCiy</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="barPa"><i>barP</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="BAvaBaMgimA"><i>BAvaBaMgimA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="BAzga"><i>BAzga</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="bitiA"><i>biti</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="brahmagraMWi"><i>brahmagraMWi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="budiyA"><i>budiy</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="cAya"><i>cAya</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="cidiyA"><i>cidiy</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="cIla"><i>cIl</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="ciwrokwi"><i>ciwrokwi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="dibiyA"><i>dibiy</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="ganImawa"><i>ganImawa</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="gopAlikA"><i>gopAlikA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="gudiyA"><i>gudiy</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="GuraGurAhata"><i>GuraGurAhat</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="haMdiyA"><i>haMdiy</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="harisa"><i>harisa</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="harIwimA"><i>harIwimA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="jA"><i></i><par n="/jA__v"/></e>
<e lm="JiJaka"><i>JiJaka</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="jIpa"><i>jIp</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="kalpanASakwi"><i>kalpanASakwi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="kAmakalA"><i>kAmakalA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="kesara"><i>kesara</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="klipa"><i>klip</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="kopalawA"><i>kopalawA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="koTariyA"><i>koTariy</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="kuwiyA"><i>kuwiy</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="lawAda"><i>lawAda</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="leKapaxXawi"><i>leKapaxXawi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="leKApuswikA"><i>leKApuswikA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="lutiyA"><i>lutiy</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="mahaPila"><i>mahaPil</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="mahArAwri"><i>mahArAwri</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mAyA"><i>mAyA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mAyAviwA"><i>mAyAviwA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="nakala"><i>nakal</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="navajAgarwi"><i>navajAgarwi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="nawi"><i>nawi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="naxiyA"><i>naxiy</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="pAkakriyA"><i>pAkakriyA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="pakvawA"><i>pakvawA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="pariXi"><i>pariXi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="pArliyAmeMta"><i>pArliyAmeMta</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="Pilma"><i>Pilm</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="pramuKasaBA"><i>pramuKasaBA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prawirakRA"><i>prawirakRA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prawiSruwi"><i>prawiSruwi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prewaSuxXi"><i>prewaSuxXi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sahokwi"><i>sahokwi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sAjiSI"><i>sAjiSI</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="sakriyawA"><i>sakriyawA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sanniXi"><i>sanniXi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="SarAPawa"><i>SarAPawa</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="SArikA"><i>SArikA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="saxasyawA"><i>saxasyawA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sOwa"><i>sOw</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="SruwikIrwi"><i>SruwikIrwi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sUci"><i>sUci</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="vAriwrA"><i>vAriwrA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="viBakwi"><i>viBakwi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="vijAnawA"><i>vijAnawA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="WA"><i>W</i><par n="W/A__v"/></e>
<e lm="wAlIma"><i>wAlIma</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="xukAna"><i>xukAn</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="xuRkIrwi"><i>xuRkIrwi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="yAwanA"><i>yAwanA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
